Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.610

Provisions applicable to plan 2.

RCW 41.40.620 through 41.40.750 shall apply only to plan 2 members.

[ 2000 c 247 s 201; 1991 c 35 s 97; 1977 ex.s. c 295 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Legislative direction and placement—1977 ex.s. c 295: "Sections 1 through 15 of this 1977 amendatory act shall be added to chapter 41.40 RCW and shall be codified as consecutive sections of the Revised Code of Washington within such chapter." [ 1977 ex.s. c 295 s 23.]

Section headings—1977 ex.s. c 295: "Section headings used in this 1977 amendatory act shall not constitute any part of the law." [ 1977 ex.s. c 295 s 22.]